New Jersey, session 221, A860.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  No person under 21 years of age shall knowingly possess an electronic smoking device that can be used to deliver nicotine or other substances to the person inhaling from the device, including, but not limited to, an electronic cigarette, cigar, cigarillo, or pipe, or any cartridge or other component of the device or related product. b.    A person who violates the provisions of subsection a. of this section shall be required to perform not less than 50 hours of community service for the first violation, not less than 100 hours of community service for the second violation, and not less than 150 hours of community service for the third and each subsequent violation.  An official authorized by statute or ordinance to enforce the State or local health codes, or a law enforcement officer having enforcement authority in that municipality, may issue a summons for a violation of the provisions of subsection a. of this section, and may serve and execute all process with respect to the enforcement of this section consistent with the Rules of Court. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.